California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
The secretary shall establish a period in which to conduct the referendum that shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration and may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. If the initial period established is less than 60 days, the secretary may extend the period.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79964.

Nonreceipt of a ballot shall not invalidate a referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79965.

If the secretary finds that a referendum vote in favor of establishing the commission has occurred, as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify the vote and give notice of the vote to growers and processors whose names and addresses are on file with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79966.

If the secretary finds that a referendum vote in favor of establishing the commission has not occurred, as provided in this article, the secretary shall certify the vote and declare this chapter inoperative. The secretary may conduct another implementation referendum vote one or more years after the previous vote has been taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79967.

(a) Upon the establishment of the commission, the secretary shall contact growers and processors in a manner determined by the secretary for the purpose of nominating and electing persons to the commission board of directors.

(b) Subsequent to the first election of members of the commission board of directors, or appointment in cases of a public member, growers and processors shall be selected pursuant to nomination and election procedures established by the commission board of directors with the concurrence of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79968.

Before the referendum vote conducted by the secretary pursuant to this article, the proponents of the commission shall deposit with the secretary an amount of funds determined necessary by the secretary to defray the expenses of preparing the necessary lists and information and conducting the vote. Any funds not used for this purpose shall be returned to the proponents of the commission who deposited the funds with the secretary. Upon establishment of the commission, the commission board of directors may reimburse the proponents of the commission for any funds deposited with the secretary and for any legal expenses and costs incurred in establishing the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Assessments and Records [79971. - 79975.]

79971.

(a) The commission board of directors shall, no later than the beginning of each marketing season, or as soon thereafter as possible, establish assessments to be paid by growers and processors for the marketing season.

(b) The assessment for growers that
 cultivate 2 to 10, inclusive, acres of agave for the marketing season shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and may be levied using a sliding scale. The assessment for growers that cultivate more than 10 acres of agave for the marketing season shall not exceed fifty
 thousand dollars ($50,000) and may be levied using a sliding scale.

(c) The assessment for processors that process 3 to 10, inclusive, tons of agave for the marketing season shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and may be levied using a sliding scale. The assessment for processors
 that process more than 10 tons of agave for the marketing season shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and may be levied using a sliding scale.

(d) An assessment greater than the amounts established pursuant to this section shall not be charged unless it is approved in accordance with the voting requirements provided in Section 79962.

 (e) The assessment shall not exceed the reasonable costs of achieving the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79972.

(a) Processors of agave shall keep a complete and accurate record of all agave processed by them with the names of the growers whose agave was processed.

(b) (1) Growers who process agave that they have cultivated shall keep a complete and accurate record of the agave processed.

(2) Growers shall, upon request of the commission, provide proof of commodity sale.

(c) The records described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall contain information required by the commission. The records shall be preserved by growers and processors for a
 period of two years and shall be offered and submitted for inspection at any reasonable time upon written demand by the commission or its duly authorized agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79973.

(a) All proprietary information obtained by the commission or the secretary from any source, including the names and addresses of growers and processors, shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed except if required by court order in a judicial proceeding.

(b) Information on volume shipments and any other related information that is required for reports to governmental agencies, financial reports to the commission on aggregate sales and inventory information, and any other information that gives only totals, but excludes individual information, may be disclosed by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79974.

Growers and processors of agave that pay the assessment shall be trustees of the assessed funds until they are paid to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission board of directors. Growers who process agave that they have cultivated shall be responsible for paying both assessments directly to the commission at the time and in the manner prescribed by the commission board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79975.

Every grower and processor shall be personally liable for the payment of the assessments owed to the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Actions and Penalties [79981. - 79988.]

79981.

(a) A person who fails to file a return or pay an assessment within the time required by the commission shall pay to the commission a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment determined to be past due and, in addition, interest on the unpaid balance at the rate of 1.5 percent per month.

(b) In addition to any other penalty imposed, the commission may require a person who fails to pay an assessment or related charge pursuant to this chapter to furnish and maintain a surety bond in a form and amount and for a period of time specified by the commission board of directors as assurance that all payments to the commission will be made when
 due.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79982.

A civil penalty not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) may be levied by the commission on any person who does any of the following:

(a) Willfully render or furnish a false report, statement, or record required by the commission, or in any way avoids the payment of an assessment.

(b) Fail to render or furnish a report, statement, or record required by the commission.

(c) When engaged in cultivating agave for processing into agave products, fails or refuses to furnish to the commission or its duly authorized agents, upon request, information concerning the name
 and address of the persons from whom agave was received and the quantity received.

(d) Secrete, destroy, or alter records required to be kept by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79983.

For purposes of according individuals aggrieved by its actions or determinations, the commission board of directors shall establish procedures for an informal hearing before the commission or before a committee of the commission established for this purpose. Appeals from the decision of the commission board of directors may be made to the secretary. The determination of the secretary shall be subject to judicial review upon petition filed with the appropriate superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79984.

(a) The commission may commence civil actions and use all remedies provided in law or equity for the collection of assessments and civil penalties, and for obtaining injunctive relief or specific performance, relating to this chapter and the procedures adopted under this chapter. A court shall issue to the commission any requested writ of attachment or injunctive relief upon a prima facie showing by verified complaint that a named defendant has violated this chapter or any other procedures of the commission, including, but not limited to, the nonpayment of assessments. A bond shall not be required to be posted by the commission as a condition for the issuance of any writ of attachment or injunctive relief.

(b) A writ of attachment shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 485.010) of Title 6.5 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing specified in Section 485.010 is not required. Injunctive relief shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that the showing of irreparable harm or of inadequate remedy at law specified by Section 526 or 527 is not required.

(c) Upon entry of any final judgment on behalf of the commission against any defendant, the court shall enjoin the defendant from conducting any type of business regarding the cultivating or processing of agave until there is full compliance with, and satisfaction of, the judgment.

(d) Upon a favorable judgment for the commission, the court may order that the commission be reimbursed for reasonable attorney’s fees and other related costs actually incurred. Venue for these actions is at the domicile or place of business of the defendant or in the county of the principal office of the commission. The commission may be sued only in the county of its principal office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79985.

Any action by the commission for any penalty or other remedy that is prescribed under this chapter shall be commenced within two years from the date of discovery of the alleged violation. An action against the commission by a person shall be commenced within two years from the date of the alleged violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79986.

The commission shall not be required to allege or prove that an adequate remedy at law does not exist in any action brought pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79987.

(a) This chapter shall be liberally construed. 

(b) The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79988.

The termination of the operation of the commission and the implementation of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [79991. - 79995.]

79991.

(a) Five years after implementation of this chapter, the secretary shall hold a public hearing, after providing proper notice to persons subject to this chapter and any other persons or entities who have requested, in writing, notice of the hearing, to determine whether the commission shall continue to operate and this chapter shall continue to be implemented.

(b) If the secretary finds after the hearing that no substantial question exists among the growers and processors assessed pursuant to this chapter regarding whether the commission shall continue to operate, the secretary shall certify the finding and this chapter shall continue to be implemented.

(c) If the secretary finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the growers and processors assessed pursuant to this chapter regarding whether the commission shall continue to operate, the secretary shall conduct a referendum among growers and processors to determine whether the operation of the commission shall be terminated, in accordance with both of the following:

(1) The commission shall continue to operate unless the secretary determines from the referendum that a majority of the eligible growers and a majority of the eligible processors voting in the referendum voted in favor of terminating the commission.

(2) If the secretary finds that a vote to terminate the operation of the commission
 has been given, the secretary shall certify the vote and declare the implementation of this chapter is suspended upon the expiration of the current marketing season. Thereupon, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 79994. A bond or security shall not be required for the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79992.

Following a hearing, or a referendum resulting in a vote to continue the operation of the commission if required, the process specified in Section 79991 shall be conducted by the secretary every five years thereafter between April 1 and March 31 of the following year, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 79993. In that case, the hearing, and referendum if required, shall be conducted every five years following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79993.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission board of directors that the commission has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the secretary that the operation of the commission be suspended. Any suspension shall not become effective until expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) (1) The secretary shall, upon receipt of a recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition described in paragraph (2) requesting the suspension, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed growers and processors to determine if the operation of the commission shall be suspended. The secretary
 shall not hold a referendum as a result of a petition described in paragraph (2) unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that the implementation of this chapter has not effectuated its declared purposes.

(2) A petition filed requesting suspension of the operation of the commission shall be signed by at least 15 percent of the growers and at least 15 percent of the processors, by number, who also cultivate and process at least 15 percent of the total volume of agave in the preceding marketing season.

(c) The secretary shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 days or more than 60 days in duration. The secretary may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the
 secretary shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. The secretary shall suspend the operation of the commission if the secretary finds both of the following:

(1) At least 40 percent of the total number of growers from the list established by the secretary participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(A) Sixty-five percent of the growers that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the growers so voting grew a majority of the total quantity of agave cultivated in the preceding marketing season by all of the growers voting in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the growers that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the growers so voting grew 65 percent or more of
 the total quantity of agave cultivated in the preceding marketing season by all of the growers voting in the referendum.

(2) At least 40 percent of the total number of processors from the list established by the secretary participate, and that either of the following occurs:

(A) Sixty-five percent of the processors that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the processors so voting processed a majority of the total quantity of agave processed in the preceding marketing season by all of the processors voting in the referendum.

(B) A majority of the processors that voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the processors so voting processed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of agave
 processed in the preceding marketing season by all of the processors voting in the referendum.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79994.

After the effective date of suspension of the operation of the commission, the operation of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission, and moneys collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating the operation of the commission, shall be returned on a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding marketing season. However, if the commission board of directors finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating the operation shall be withdrawn from the approved
 depository and paid into a related state or federal program or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

79995.

Upon suspension of the operation of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to growers and processors affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 725, Sec. 1.   (AB 2606)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 23. CALIFORNIA DESERT NATIVE PLANTS [80001. - 80201.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [80001. - 80006.]

80001.

This division shall be known and may be cited as the California Desert Native Plants Act.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70500 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

80002.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in this division, to protect California desert native plants from unlawful harvesting on both public and privately owned lands. It is also the intent of the Legislature to provide the people of this state with the information necessary to legally harvest native plants so as to ultimately transplant those plants with the greatest possible chance of survival. It is the further intent of the Legislature to encourage public participation in implementing the safeguards established by this division and in evaluating the effectiveness and desirability of the safeguards.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70501 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 44.)
-------------------------------------------

80003.

This division is applicable only within the boundaries of the Counties of Imperial, Inyo, Kern, Los Angeles, Mono, Riverside, San Bernardino, and San Diego. The director may thereafter revise the boundaries of the areas of the state which shall be subject to this division after a public hearing required to be held pursuant to Section 80074 and upon receipt of a resolution approving the change of boundaries by the board of supervisors of the affected county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70502 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 45.)
-------------------------------------------

80004.

Persons engaged in the production, storage, sale, delivery, or transportation of nursery stock pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6701) of Division 4 are not required to obtain a permit pursuant to this division, unless those activities involve the harvesting of native plants growing in a wild, uncultivated state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70503 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 46.)
-------------------------------------------

80005.

Persons engaged in the production, storage, sale, delivery, or transportation of nursery stock pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6701) of Division 4 shall not receive any harvested native plants, unless each plant has securely and properly attached thereto a valid native plant tag and seal.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70504 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 47.)
-------------------------------------------

80006.

Persons engaged in the sale of nursery stock pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 6701) of Division 4 shall maintain records of their receipts or purchases for sale or resale of any native plant. The records shall include the name and address of the person selling or delivering the plants and shall be subject to inspection by the commissioner or the director.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70505 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 48.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [80051. - 80064.]

80051.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions of this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70600 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 49.)
-------------------------------------------

80052.

“Landowner” includes the public agency administering any public lands within the areas subject to this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70601 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 50.)
-------------------------------------------

80053.

“Harvest” means to remove or cut and remove from the place where grown.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70602 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

80054.

“Harvester” means a person who harvests a native plant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70603 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 52.)
-------------------------------------------

80055.

“Director” means the Director of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70604 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 53.)
-------------------------------------------

80056.

“Department” means the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70605 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 54.)
-------------------------------------------

80057.

“Tag” means a paper or cloth label that can be attached to a native plant or a commercial load by means of a string and a seal, which tag specifies, among other things, a serial number, type of plant, fee required, location of origin, date of removal, witnessing authority, applicant, destination, and proposed use, including, but not limited to, commercial processing or landscaping.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70606 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 55.)
-------------------------------------------

80058.

“Seal” means a metal, tamperproof clamp used to permanently affix the tag to a native plant.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70607 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

80059.

“Resale” means native plants harvested, possessed, or transported with the intent to sell the plants for the ultimate purpose of landscaping or decoration, or both.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70608 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

80060.

“Resale load” means native plants harvested, possessed, or transported for resale purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70609 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 58.)
-------------------------------------------

80061.

“Native plant” means any tree, shrub, bulb, or plant or part thereof, except its fruit, named in this division as being subject to this division or added by the director pursuant to Section 80074, which is growing wild. “Native plant” includes any part of any tree of the following species, whether living or dead:

(a) Olneya tesota (desert ironwood).

(b) All species of the genus Prosopis (mesquites).

(c) All species of the genus Cercidium (palos verdes).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70610 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 59.)
-------------------------------------------

80062.

“Commercial harvesting” means harvesting native plants for an ultimate use other than as landscaping or decorative material and with the plants’ tops or branches, or both, boughs, or limbs removed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70611 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 60.)
-------------------------------------------

80063.

“Permit” means an application form to harvest native plants that has been filled out by the applicant and approved and officially endorsed by the commissioner or sheriff of the county wherein the native plants covered by the application are located.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70612 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

80064.

“Wood receipt” means a receipt that is to accompany one or more cords of wood harvested under this division. The wood receipt shall contain information which specifies, among other things, a serial number, species of wood, fee required, location of origin, date of removal, witnessing authority, applicant, destination, and proposed use, including, but not limited to, commercial processing landscaping.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70613 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 62.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Regulated Native Plants [80071. - 80075.]

80071.

The botanical names of the plants referred to in this chapter shall, in all cases, govern in the interpretation of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70630 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 63.)
-------------------------------------------

80072.

The following native plants, or any parts thereof, may not be harvested except for scientific or educational purposes under a permit issued by the commissioner of the county in which the native plants are growing:

(a) All species of Burseraceae family (elephant tree).

(b) Carnegiea gigantea (sahuaro cactus).

(c) Ferocactus acanthodes (barrel cactus).

(d) Castela emoryi (crucifixion thorn).

(e) Dudleya saxosa (panamint dudleya).

(f) Pinus longaeva (bristlecone pine).

(g) Washingtonia filifera (fan palm).

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70631 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

80073.

The following native plants, or any part thereof, may not be harvested except under a permit issued by the commissioner or the sheriff of the county in which the native plants are growing:

(a) All species of the family Agavaceae (century plants, nolinas, yuccas).

(b) All species of the family Cactaceae (cacti), except for the plants listed in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 80072 which may be harvested under a permit obtained pursuant to that section.

(c) All species of the family Fouquieriaceae (ocotillo, candlewood).

(d) All species of the genus Prosopis (mesquites).

(e) All species of the genus Cercidium (palos verdes).

(f) Acacia greggii (catclaw).

(g) Atriplex hymenelytra (desert-holly).

(h) Dalea spinosa (smoke tree).

(i) Olneya tesota (desert ironwood), including both dead and live desert ironwood.

The fruit from the native plants listed in this section may be harvested without a permit.

The commissioner may establish limits on the quantity of desert ironwood which may be taken under any permit and on the number of permits for the taking of desert ironwood which may be issued. The commissioner may adopt such rules and regulations as may be necessary for the protection of the ironwood resource.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the director may add desert ironwood to, or remove it from, the jurisdiction of this division pursuant to Section 80074.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70632 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 65.)
-------------------------------------------

80074.

After consultation with the Secretary of the Resources Agency and after a public hearing, the secretary may add to, or remove from, the jurisdiction of this division a native plant. A public hearing on native plants may be held at least once every 24 months in a county subject to this division and in a location that is convenient to a large segment of the public.

In deciding whether to call a public hearing, the secretary may consider a request from a public or private group, including concerned citizens, and the secretary shall convene such a hearing when requested by resolution of any county board of supervisors. The secretary may consider at the hearing which plants are in need of protection and whether the boundaries of the area to be protected should be changed pursuant to Section 80003.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 460, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

80075.

Any native plant that is declared to be a rare, endangered, or threatened species by federal or state law or regulations, including, but not limited to, the Fish and Game Code, is exempt from this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70634 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 67.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Enforcement Powers and Administrative Responsibilities [80101. - 80108.]

80101.

(a) The commissioner or the sheriff of a county subject to this division shall issue, in accordance with this division, permits, wood receipts, tags, and seals for a fee as prescribed by the board of supervisors of the county where the native plants are located.

(b) The fee shall not be less than one dollar ($1) per plant for all native plants, except as follows:

(1) For Yucca brevifolia (Joshua tree), not less than two dollars ($2) per plant.

(2) For trees, live or dead, mesquite, palo verde, or ironwood species of trees, cut or removed for wood, as provided in Section 80103, not less than one dollar ($1) per cord.

(3) For Yucca Schidigera used for commercial harvesting, not less than three dollars ($3) per ton.

(c) The fees shall cover the cost of issuing a permit and may cover other related costs, including, but not limited to, administration, enforcement, and research costs. The permit shall specify, among other things, the species of native plants which may be harvested, the area from which plants may be harvested, and the manner in which plants may be harvested.

(d) No person, except as provided in this division, shall harvest, transport, offer for sale, or have in his or her possession any native plant, unless, at the time of harvesting, he or she has a valid permit or valid wood receipt therefor on his or her person, attaches the required tags and seals to the native plants, and exhibits the permit, wood receipt, and tags and seals upon request for inspection by any duly authorized agent of the commissioner or any peace officer as provided in this division. No wood receipt or tag and seal is valid unless it is issued with a valid permit and the permit bears the tag number or wood receipt number on its face.

(e) Native plants which have been tagged and sealed, as provided in this section, may be transported under a California nursery stock certificate or a shipping permit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70650 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

80102.

(a) Each permit authorizing the harvesting, transporting, or possessing of native plants, except trees cut or removed for wood as provided in Section 80103, shall be accompanied by a sufficient number of tags and seals. The permittee or his or her agent shall attach the tags and seals to the native plants at the time of harvesting and before transporting in such manner as prescribed by the commissioner of the county in which the native plants are located. After any native plant has been legally harvested and tagged or sealed as provided in this division, it is unlawful to remove the tag or seal until the plant has been transplanted into its ultimate site for landscaping or decoration. The tag or seal may be removed from the plant only by the commissioner or the ultimate owner of the plant, who shall retain the tag or seal as proof of ownership.

(b) No permit or tag or seal is transferable by the permittee or his or her agent, nor shall it be used by anyone except that person to whom the permit or tag or seal was issued, and no refunds shall be made for the purchase thereof.

(c) Every permittee is responsible for the acts of any other person or persons acting under any authority, express or implied, of the permittee.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70651 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

80103.

(a) Each permit authorizing the harvesting, transporting, or possessing of live or dead mesquite, palo verde, or ironwood species of trees which are harvested for wood, shall be accompanied by a wood receipt. Any required wood receipt shall be in the possession of the person harvesting, transporting, or possessing the wood.

(b) No permit or wood receipt is transferable by the permittee or his or her agent, nor shall it be used by anyone other than the person to whom the permit or wood receipt was issued or his or her agent or employee, except that the wood receipt shall be transferred by the permittee or his or her agent or employee to the purchaser of the wood covered by the receipt as proof of ownership.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70652 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 70.)
-------------------------------------------

80104.

Any person in possession of a valid permit for the removal of dead plants or wood issued by the United States Forest Service, the National Park Service, or the Bureau of Land Management, or any person in compliance with appropriate federal regulations and policies allowing the removal of dead plants or wood from lands administered by the Bureau of Land Management, is not required to obtain a permit pursuant to this division for the removal or possession of those dead plants or wood.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70653 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 71.)
-------------------------------------------

80105.

The director may adopt necessary rules and regulations not in conflict with this division for the enforcement of its provisions.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70654 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

80106.

The director or any of his or her duly authorized agents, any commissioner, or any peace officer is authorized and directed to enter in or upon any premises or other place, train, vehicle, or other means of transportation within or entering the state, which is suspected of containing or having present therein or thereon native plants in violation of this division, in order to examine permits and wood receipts and observe tags and seals.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70655 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 73.)
-------------------------------------------

80107.

When any power or authority is given by any provision of this division to any person, it may be exercised by any deputy, inspector, or agent duly authorized by that person. Any person in whom the enforcement of any provision of this division is vested has the power of a peace officer as to that enforcement, which shall include state or federal agencies with which cooperative agreements have been made by the department to enforce any provision of this division.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70656 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

80108.

Any county may adopt ordinances not in conflict with this division for the preservation of native plants specified in Sections 80072 and 80073.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70657 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 75.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Harvesting of Native Plants [80111. - 80121.]

80111.

(a) Except as provided in this division, it is unlawful for any person to destroy, dig up, mutilate, or harvest any living native plant, or the living or dead parts of any native plant, except its fruit, without obtaining written permission from the landowner and a permit and any required wood receipts or tags and seals.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to falsify any paper or document issued to give permission for any person to harvest a native plant specified in Section 80073, or to fail to comply with all of the conditions or stipulations of the permit.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70680 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 76.)
-------------------------------------------

80112.

The commissioner of the county wherein the plants are located may issue a permit to a scientific or educational institution to harvest a definite number of plants listed in Section 80072 for scientific or educational purposes, if permission is obtained from the landowner on whose property the plants are located.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 70681 by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 77.)
-------------------------------------------

80113.

Permits issued for the removal of native plants shall be valid only for a stated period of time to allow the permittee to remove the specific amount of plants or wood stated in the permit, or the period of time stated by the landowner as part of the landowner’s permission, whichever is shorter, but in no case for more than one year.
